testdata/short-invalid.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>

<dictionary>

<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
<sdefs>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="ppres"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
<pardef n="det2loc__np">

	                        <e r="LR"><p><l/><r/></p></e>
    <sdef n="sent"/>

	                        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>le<b/></l><r/></p></e>

  </pardef>
    

<pardef n="/avoir__vbhaver">

   <!-- comment -->            
                        <e><p><l>a</l><r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

             </pardef>

   
<pardef n="ordinales">

    
                              <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]1|1)</re>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
         <r>er<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 </pardef>

<pardef n="ancien__adj">

            
                        <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ne</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>nes</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<pardef n="urls">

                            <e>
      <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z0-9\-]+([.][a-z]+)+(/[a-z0-9_]+)*([.][a-z]+)*)</re>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

 <pardef n="lu&#xEE;/mes__vblex">

                                    <e r="LR"><p><l>mes</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                                    <e r="LR"><p><l>tes</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<pardef n="S__encimp">

            
                        <e><p><l>-en</l><r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-la</l><r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-le</l><r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-le</l><r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-les</l><r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-les</l><r>leur<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-les</l><r>lui<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-moi</l><r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-nous</l><r>nous<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


            
                        <e><p><l>-toi</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-vous</l><r>vous<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>-y</l><r>y<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="a&#xE9;rien"><i>aérien</i><par n="ancien__adj"/></e>
                        <e><par n="/avoir__vbhaver"/></e>
			<e><par n="ordinales"/></e>
                       <e><par n="urls"/></e>
